tests/v_ҫи_del.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "The verb ҫи":
    ҫи<v><tv><pres><p1><sg> : ҫийетӗп
    ҫи<v><tv><pres><p2><sg> : ҫийетӗн
    ҫи<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : ҫийет
    ҫи<v><tv><pres><p1><pl> : ҫийетпӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><pres><p2><pl> : ҫийетӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><pres><p3><pl> : ҫийеҫҫӗ
    ҫи<v><tv><past><p1><sg> : ҫирӗм
    ҫи<v><tv><past><p2><sg> : ҫирӗн
    ҫи<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : ҫирчӗ
    ҫи<v><tv><past><p1><pl> : ҫирӗмӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><past><p2><pl> : ҫирӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><past><p3><pl> : ҫирчӗҫ
    ҫи<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : ҫийем
    ҫи<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : ҫи
    ҫи<v><tv><imp><p3><sg> : ҫитӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><imp><p1><pl> : ҫиер
    ҫи<v><tv><imp><p2><pl> : ҫийӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><imp><p3><pl> : ҫиччӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> : ҫийӗп
    ҫи<v><tv><fut><p2><sg> : ҫийӗн
    ҫи<v><tv><fut><p3><sg> : ҫийӗ
    ҫи<v><tv><fut><p1><pl> : ҫиӗпӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><fut><p2><pl> : ҫийӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><fut><p3><pl> : ҫийӗҫ
    ҫи<v><tv><cond><p1><sg> : ҫийӗттӗм
    ҫи<v><tv><cond><p2><sg> : ҫийӗттӗн
    ҫи<v><tv><cond><p3><sg> : ҫийӗччӗ
    ҫи<v><tv><cond><p1><pl> : ҫийӗттӗмӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><cond><p2><pl> : ҫийӗттӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><cond><p3><pl> : ҫийӗччӗҫ
    ҫи<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : ҫийӗпин
    ҫи<v><tv><opt><p2><sg> : ҫийӗсӗн
    ҫи<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : ҫийин
    ҫи<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : ҫийӗпӗрин
    ҫи<v><tv><opt><p2><pl> : ҫийӗсӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : ҫийӗҫин
    ҫи<v><tv><abil><pres><p1><sg> : ҫийеетӗп
    ҫи<v><tv><abil><pres><p2><sg> : ҫийеетӗн
    ҫи<v><tv><abil><pres><p3><sg> : ҫийеет
    ҫи<v><tv><abil><pres><p1><pl> : ҫийеетпӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><abil><pres><p2><pl> : ҫийеетӗр
    ҫи<v><tv><abil><pres><p3><pl> : ҫийееҫҫӗ
